Utah statutes.
9-6-603.   Duties of office.
(1)  The office shall:
(a)  recommend to the Museum Services Advisory Board:
(i)  policies regarding:
(A)  a grants program; and
(B)  the equitable dissemination of office technical assistance; and
(ii)  guidelines for determining eligibility for office grants;
(b)  advise state and local government agencies and employees regarding museum
related issues, including museum capital development projects;
(c)  provide to Utah museums technical advice and information about sources of
direct technical assistance;
(d)  assist and advise Utah museums in locating sources of training for their
museum staff members;
(e)  develop and coordinate programs, workshops, seminars, and similar
activities designed to provide training for staff members of Utah museums;
(f)  undertake scholarly research as necessary to understand the training
needs of the museum community and to assess how those needs could best be met;
(g)  administer a state Museum Grant Program to assist eligible Utah museums;
and
(h)  establish a program by January 1, 2009, by rule, creating a certified
local museum designation, including any provisions necessary to ensure public
confidence in charitable solicitation undertaken by a certified local museum.
(2) (a)  For a pass-through funding grant of at least $25,000, the office
shall make quarterly disbursements to the pass-through funding grant
recipient, contingent upon the office receiving a quarterly progress report
from the pass-through grant recipient.
(b)  The office shall:
(i)  provide the pass-through grant recipient with a progress report form for
the reporting purposes of Subsection (2)(a); and
(ii)  include reporting requirement instructions with the form.
